pt-PT: Forma da base da válvula: Cónico; Redondo; Porta lateral; Em forma de T; Outro
cs: Tvar patky ventilku: Kuželový; Kulatý; Boční port; Ve tvaru T; Jiné
hr-HR: Oblik baze ventila: Stožasti; Okrugli; Bočni otvor; U obliku slova T; Ostalo
zh-TW: 氣嘴底座形狀: 圓錐形; 圓形; 側孔; T 形; 其他
nb: Ventilbaseform: Konisk; Rund; Sideport; T-formet; Annet
nl: Ventielbasis vorm: Conisch; Rond; Zijpoort; T-vormig; Overig
sk-SK: Tvar základne ventilu: Kónický; Okrúhly; Bočný otvor; V tvare T; Iné
de: Form der Ventilbasis: Konisch; Rund; Seitenanschluss; T-förmig; Sonstiges
vi: Hình dạng đế van: Hình nón; Tròn; Cổng bên; Hình chữ T; Khác
ko: 밸브 베이스 모양: 원추형; 원형; 측면 포트; T자형; 기타
da: Ventilbaseform: Konisk; Rund; Sideport; T-formet; Andet
pt-BR: Válvula formato da base: Cônico; Redondo; Porta lateral; Em forma de T; Outro
ja: バルブベース形状: 円錐形; 円形; サイドポート; T 字型; その他
fr: Forme de la base de valve: Conique; Ronde; Orifice latéral; En T; Autre
tr: Valf taban şekli: Konik; Yuvarlak; Yan bağlantı noktası; T şeklinde; Diğer
lt-LT: Vožtuvo pagrindo forma: Kūginė; Apvali; Šoninis prievadas; T formos; Kita
bg-BG: Форма на основата на клапана: Конусовидна; Кръгла; Страничен отвор; Т-образен; Друга
ro-RO: Forma bazei valvei: Conică; Rotundă; Port lateral; În formă de T; Altele
hu: Szeleptalp alakja: Kúpos; Kerek; Oldalsó port; T alakú; Egyéb
ru: Форма основания клапана: Коническая; Круглая; Боковое отверстие; Т-образная; Другое
sv: Ventilbasens form: Konisk; Rund; Sidoport; T-formad; Övrigt
pl: Kształt podstawy zaworu: Stożkowy; Okrągły; Port boczny; W kształcie litery T; Inne
el: Σχήμα βάσης βαλβίδας: Κωνικό; Στρογγυλό; Πλευρικής θύρας; Σχήματος Τ; Άλλο
sl-SI: Oblika podnožja ventila: Konična; Okrogla; Stranski priključek; V obliki črke T; Drugo
it: Forma della base della valvola: Conica; Rotonda; Apertura laterale; A forma di T; Altro
es: Forma de la base de la válvula: Cónico; Redondo; Puerto lateral; En forma de T; Otro
en: Valve base shape: Conical; Round; Side port; T-shaped; Other
fi: Venttiilin pohjan muoto: Kartio; Pyöreä; Sivuportti; T-muotoinen; Muu
th: รูปทรงฐานวาล์ว: ทรงกรวย; ทรงกลม; พอร์ตด้านข้าง; รูปตัว T; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 气门嘴底座形状: 圆锥形; 圆形; 侧端口; T 形; 其他